apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="h/o__v">

<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>onA</l><r>onA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>one</l><r>onA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>

<!--added by varshith 28/08/24-->
<!-- verbal adjective-->

<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>owA_huA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owI_huI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owI_huI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owI_huI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owI_huI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_hue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owe_rahanA_hE</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="ho"><i>h</i><par n="h/o__v"/></e>
